Maryland, session 2025, HB1302.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Housing and Community Development
2–304.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “APPROVED HOUSING COUNSELING AGENCY” MEANS AN
ORGANIZATION THAT IS APPROVED BY THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND
URBAN DEVELOPMENT TO PROVIDE HOUSING COUNSELING SERVICES DIRECTLY OR
THROUGH AFFILIATES OR BRANCHES.
(3) “HOUSING COUNSELING” MEANS COUNSELOR–TO–CLIENT
ASSISTANCE THAT ADDRESSES UNIQUE FINANCIAL CIRCUMSTANCES OR HOUSING
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1302*

HOUSE BILL 1302
ISSUES AND FOCUSES ON WAYS OF OVERCOMING SPECIFIC OBSTACLES TO
ACHIEVING A HOUSING GOAL.
(B) AS A CONDITION ON THE RECEIPT OF FUNDING FROM THE
DEPARTMENT FOR ANY PROJECT TO CONSTRUCT, ACQUIRE, OR REHABILITATE
RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY FOR USE AS HOUSING, A FUNDING RECIPIENT SHALL
AGREE TO OFFER HOUSING COUNSELING SERVICES TO PROSPECTIVE RESIDENTS.
(C) HOUSING COUNSELING SERVICES OFFERED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF
THIS SECTION SHALL BE PROVIDED BY HOUSING COUNSELORS CERTIFIED BY THE
U.S. DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND URBAN DEVELOPMENT AND EMPLOYED BY AN
APPROVED HOUSING COUNSELING AGENCY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.